Maryland, session 2025, HB1065.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Land Use
22–309.
(a) There is a board of appeals in Prince George’s County.
(b) (1) The County Council of Prince George’s County shall appoint AT LEAST
three members to the board.
(2) Each member of the board shall be a resident of the regional district in
Prince George’s County.
(3) The term of a member is 4 years.
(4) A member who is appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve for the rest of
the term.
(c) The board each year shall elect a chair and vice–chair.
(d) (1) All meetings of the board shall be public.
(2) The board shall keep minutes of its proceedings.
(3) (i) The board shall act by resolution.
– 1 –

Ch. 592 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) [At least two members] A SIMPLE MAJORITY of the board must
concur in any resolution.
(4) The board or any officer of the board may administer oaths and compel
the attendance of witnesses.
(5) The district council may adopt regulations consistent with this subtitle
to govern the organization and procedure of the board.
(6) The board may adopt supplemental rules of procedure consistent with
this subtitle and the regulations of the district council.
(e) (1) The County Council shall determine the compensation of the members
of the board.
(2) The County Council may provide staff for the board.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 2 –